Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 7

Ensuring Patient Access to Pharmacy Drug Disposal Programs Act of 2015

63-10-701. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Ensuring Patient Access to Pharmacy Drug Disposal Programs Act of 2015.”

Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 2.

63-10-702. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Authorized pharmacy disposal site” means any pharmacy practice site that qualifies as a collection site under 21 CFR 1317.40; and

“Pharmacy drug disposal program” means any voluntary drug disposal program located at, or implemented by, a Tennessee-licensed pharmacy located in this state, in accordance with all state and federal rules and regulations.

Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 3.

63-10-703. Participation in pharmacy drug disposal programs.

Any Tennessee-licensed pharmacy located within this state is authorized to participate in a pharmacy drug disposal program that meets or exceeds the minimum requirements set forth in federal rules and regulations regarding collection and destruction of prescription drugs, including controlled and noncontrolled substances.

Participation in a pharmacy drug disposal program by a Tennessee-licensed pharmacy located within this state shall be voluntary.

The pharmacist-in-charge, as defined by § 63-10-204, for the pharmacy practice site shall be responsible for deciding whether the pharmacy participates in a pharmacy drug disposal program.

No person shall mandate pharmacist participation in a pharmacy drug disposal program at a pharmacy practice site.

Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Subsections (c), (d), and (e) of § 63-10-703, as enacted by Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4, have been codified as §§ 63-10-704, 63-10-705, and 63-10-706, respectively, by authority of the code commission.

63-10-704. Immunity of participants.

Any pharmacy practice site voluntarily participating in a pharmacy drug disposal program shall be held harmless and shall not be held liable for any theft, robbery, or other criminal activity related to its participation in the pharmacy drug disposal program or the collection, storage, or destruction of prescription drugs, including controlled and noncontrolled substances collected through a pharmacy drug disposal program, as long as the pharmacy practice site is acting in good faith and operating in compliance with all state and federal rules and regulations regarding drug disposal.

Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Subsections (c), (d), and (e) of § 63-10-703, as enacted by Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4, have been codified as §§ 63-10-704, 63-10-705, and 63-10-706, respectively, by authority of the code commission.

63-10-705. List of participants to be maintained by board.

The board of pharmacy shall maintain a list of Tennessee-licensed pharmacies located within this state that participate in pharmacy drug disposal programs as authorized by state and federal rules and regulations.

Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Subsections (c), (d), and (e) of § 63-10-703, as enacted by Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4, have been codified as §§ 63-10-704, 63-10-705, and 63-10-706, respectively, by authority of the code commission.

63-10-706. Promulgation of rules.

The board of pharmacy shall promulgate rules necessary for implementation of this part. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Subsections (c), (d), and (e) of § 63-10-703, as enacted by Acts 2015, ch. 40, § 4, have been codified as §§ 63-10-704, 63-10-705, and 63-10-706, respectively, by authority of the code commission.